California, session 20252026, AB1840.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 86205 of the Government Code is amended to read:86205. No A lobbyist or lobbying firm shall: shall not:(a) Do anything with the purpose of placing any elected state officer, legislative official, agency official, or state candidate under personal obligation to the lobbyist, the lobbying firm, or the lobbyist’s or the firm’s employer.(b) Deceive or attempt to deceive any elected state officer, legislative official, agency official, or state candidate with regard to any material fact pertinent to any pending or proposed legislative or administrative action.(c) Cause or influence the introduction of any bill or amendment thereto for the purpose of thereafter being employed to secure its passage or defeat.(d) Attempt to create a fictitious appearance of public favor or disfavor of any proposed legislative or administrative action or to cause any communication to be sent to any elected state officer, legislative official, agency official, or state candidate in the name of any fictitious person or in the name of any real person, except with the consent of such real person.(e) Represent falsely, either directly or indirectly, that the lobbyist or the lobbying firm can control the official action of any elected state officer, legislative official, or agency official.(f) Accept or agree to accept any payment in any way contingent upon the defeat, enactment, or outcome of any proposed legislative or administrative action.(g) Violate Section 87451.SEC. 2. Section 87451 is added to the Government Code, to read:87451. (a) A covered person shall not knowingly engage in a covered transaction if, before or at the time of the covered transaction, the covered person possesses, or it is reasonably foreseeable the covered person may obtain in the course of their official duties, material nonpublic information relating to the covered transaction.(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Covered person” means an elected or appointed public official at any level of state or local government, an individual specified in Section 87200, a designated employee as defined in Section 82019, or a lobbyist as defined in Section 82039.(2) “Covered transaction” means the purchase, sale, or exchange of a prediction market contract that bets or speculates on the outcome, occurrence, or nonoccurrence of any of the following:(A) An administrative action, as defined in Section 82002.(B) An election, as defined in Section 82002.(C) A governmental decision made in the course of a covered person’s official duties.(D) Any action or decision before the Legislature, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 87102.5.(3) “Material nonpublic information” means information that a reasonable investor would consider significant in making an investment decision and that is not publicly available.(4) “Prediction market contract” means a contract, derivative, financial instrument, or investment that is both of the following:(A) Issued, listed on, or offered by a business entity.(B) Related to the outcome, occurrence, or nonoccurrence of a future event or events.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.